Vermont, session 2025-2026, S214.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 829 is amended to read:
§ 829. PREKINDERGARTEN EDUCATION
* * *
(i) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the NEK Choice
School District may provide prekindergarten education to eligible
prekindergarten students by paying tuition pursuant to this section to one or
more prekindergarten programs operated by a public school in New Hampshire
that is located in a school district within 25 miles of the Vermont border. The
Essex North Supervisory Union shall be responsible for administering
enrollment procedures and managing prekindergarten tuition payments
pursuant to this section and State Board of Education rules. The
superintendent may apply for and receive a waiver from the Agency of
Education and Agency of Human Services of any rule provision that is
impractical for the NEK Choice School District or the New Hampshire
program by demonstrating that a substantially equivalent provision is offered.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 8, 2026
VT LEG #390169 v.1